North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Article 19A. Records of Sales of Farm Products.

§ 106-202.6.
Dated sales confirmation slips; inapplicable to consumers.

In every sales transaction of farm or horticultural crops, or animal products, the buyer, broker, or authorized agent shall give to the seller a sales confirmation slip bearing the date of the sales transaction.

This section shall not apply if the buyer is a natural person and/or the farm or horticultural crops, or animal products are purchased primarily for a personal, family, or household purpose.

History.

1979, c. 363.

§§ 106-202.7 through 106-202.11.

Reserved for future codification purposes.